Washington statutes.
RCW 17.24.101

Statewide survey and control activity.

If there is reason to believe that a plant or bee pest may adversely impact the forestry, agricultural, horticultural, floricultural, or related industries of the state; or may cause harm to the environment of the state; or such information is needed to facilitate or allow the movement of forestry, agricultural, horticultural, or related products to out-of-state, foreign and domestic markets, the director may conduct, or cause to be conducted, surveys to determine the presence, absence, or distribution of a pest.

The director may take such measures as may be required to control or eradicate such pests where such measures are determined to be in the public interest, are technically feasible, and for which funds are appropriated or provided through cooperative agreements.

[ 1991 c 257 s 14.]